Alabama, session 2026rs, HB615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-18-310, as amended by Act
2026-100, 2026 Regular Session, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§40-18-310
As used in this article, the following terms shall have
Page 1

As used in this article, the following terms shall have
HB615 INTRODUCED
the following meanings:
(1) CATASTROPHE SAVINGS ACCOUNT. A regular savings
account or money market account, established in a bank or
credit union with a brick and mortar location in Alabama or a
veteran-related financial institution, by an insurance
policyholder who is a state income taxpayer for residential
property in this state to cover: (i) an insurance deductible
under an insurance policy for one residential property owned
by a taxpayer that covers hurricane, rising floodwaters, or
other catastrophic windstorm event damage or by an individual
to cover self-insured losses for the taxpayer's residential
property from a hurricane, rising floodwaters, or other
catastrophic windstorm event; (ii) the annual cost of a
FORTIFIED endorsement to supplement an insurance policy; or
(iii) the cost of mitigation actions that would reduce the
risk of hurricane, rising floodwaters, or other catastrophic
windstorm event damage, including, but not limited to, costs
associated with reroofing and obtaining evaluation services to
qualify for a FORTIFIED designation, collectively, "Qualified
Catastrophe Expenses." The account must be labeled as a
catastrophe savings account in order to qualify as a
catastrophe savings account as defined in this article. A
taxpayer may establish only one catastrophe savings account
and shall specify that the purpose of the account is to cover
the Qualified Catastrophe Expenses.
(2) WINDSTORM EVENT. Windstorms, cyclones, hurricanes,
tornadoes, high winds, and hail, and similar perils not
normally among those covered under most property casualty
Page 2

normally among those covered under most property casualty
HB615 INTRODUCED
insurance policies but obtainable through the purchase of
wind, wind and hail, storm or windstorm coverage, or all."
Section 2. This act applies to tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3